Washington statutes.
RCW 10.01.190

Prosecutorial powers of attorney general.

In any criminal proceeding instituted or conducted by the attorney general, the attorney general and assistants are deemed to be prosecuting attorneys and have all prosecutorial powers vested in prosecuting attorneys of the state of Washington by statute or court rule.

[ 1981 c 335 s 4.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1981 c 335: See RCW 43.10.230.